Alaska statutes. Title 29. Municipal Government.
Article 4. Borough Sales and Use Tax.

Sec. 29.45.650.
Sales and use tax.

Except as provided in AS

04.21.010(c)

, AS

29.45.750

, and in (f), (h), (i), and (j) of this section, a borough may levy and collect a sales tax on sales, rents, and on services provided in the borough. The sales tax may apply to any or all of these sources. Notwithstanding other statutes, exemptions may be granted by ordinance. A borough may wholly or partially exempt a source from a borough sales tax that is taxed by a city in that borough under AS

29.45.700

.

A borough levying a sales tax may also by ordinance levy a use tax on the storage, use, or consumption of tangible personal property in the borough. The use tax rate must equal the sales tax rate and the use tax shall be levied only on buyers.

A person who furnishes proof, in the form required by the borough tax collector, that the person has paid a sales tax on the source on which a use tax is levied by the borough is required to pay the use tax only to the extent of the difference between the amount of the sales tax paid and the amount of the use tax levied by the borough. This subsection applies to a sales tax levied in any taxing jurisdiction whether inside or outside the state.

If the assembly charges interest on sales taxes not paid when due, the rate of interest may not exceed 15 percent a year on the delinquent taxes and shall be charged from the due date until paid in full. This subsection applies to home rule and general law municipalities.

A borough may provide for the creation, recording, and notice of a lien on real or personal property to secure the payment of a sales and use tax, and the interest, penalties, and administration costs in the event of delinquency. When recorded, the sales tax lien has priority over all other liens except (1) liens for property taxes and special assessments; (2) liens that were perfected before the recording of the sales tax lien for amounts actually advanced before the recording of the sales tax lien; (3) mechanics’ and materialmen’s liens for which claims of lien under AS

34.35.070

or notices of right to lien under AS

34.35.064

have been recorded before the recording of the sales tax lien. This subsection applies to home rule and general law municipalities.

A borough may not levy and collect a sales tax on a purchase made with (1) food coupons, food stamps, or other type of allotment issued under 7 U.S.C. 2011 — 2036 (Food Stamp Program); or (2) food instruments, food vouchers, or other type of certificate issued under 42 U.S.C. 1786 (Special Supplemental Food Program for Women, Infants, and Children). For purposes of this subsection, the value of a food stamp allotment paid in the form of a wage subsidy as authorized under AS

47.25.975(b)

is not considered to be an allotment issued under 7 U.S.C. 2011 — 2036 (Food Stamp Program). This subsection applies to home rule and general law municipalities.

[Repealed, § 2 ch 159 SLA 1990.]

A borough may not levy or collect a sales tax on sales, rents, and services, or a use tax on the storage, use, or consumption of personal property on the following activities:

the sale, lease, rental, storage, consumption, or distribution in this state of or the provision of services relating to an orbital space facility, space propulsion system, or space vehicle, satellite, or station of any kind possessing space flight capacity, including the components of them;

the sale, lease, rental, storage, consumption, or use of tangible personal property placed on or used aboard an orbital space facility, space propulsion system, or space vehicle, satellite, or station of any kind, regardless of whether the tangible personal property is returned to this state for subsequent use, storage, or consumption; an exemption under this paragraph is not affected by the failure of a launch to occur, or the destruction of a launch vehicle or a component of a launch vehicle.

A borough may not levy or collect a sales or use tax on (1) the physical transfer of refined fuel, unless the transfer is made in connection with a sale or use in the borough, or (2) wholesale sales or transfers of fuel refined in the borough. A sale is in the borough if the fuel is delivered to the buyer in the borough. A use is in the borough if the fuel is consumed in the borough. This subsection applies to home rule and general law municipalities.

The prohibitions on the levy and collection of a sales or use tax on refined fuel in (i) of this section do not apply to a borough if, on the effective date of (i) of this section, the borough is

levying and collecting a sales or use tax on the sale, use, or transfer of refined fuel under an ordinance adopted before January 1, 2003; or

receiving payments in lieu of a sales or use tax on the sale, use, or transfer of refined fuel under an agreement entered into before January 1, 2003.

A borough may not levy or collect a sales or use tax on a construction contract awarded by the state or a state agency, or on a subcontract awarded in connection with the project funded under the construction contract. This subsection applies to home rule and general law municipalities.

History.

(§ 12 ch 74 SLA 1985; am §§ 3, 4 ch 38 SLA 1986; am § 1 ch 20 SLA 1987; am § 2 ch 30 SLA 1988; am §§ 1, 2 ch 96 SLA 1989; am §§ 1, 2 ch 159 SLA 1990; am §§ 4, 5 ch 88 SLA 1991; am § 4 ch 69 SLA 2002; am § 3 ch 100 SLA 2002; am §§ 4, 5 ch 117 SLA 2003; am §§ 1, 2 ch 30 SLA 2005; am § 3 ch 80 SLA 2005)

Conditional amendment of subsection (a). —

Under sec. 4,
ch. 100, SLA 2002, as amended by sec. 9,
ch. 117, SLA 2003, and sec. 2,
ch. 30, SLA 2005, subsection (a) is amended to read as follows:
“Except as provided in
AS

04.21.010(c)

and in (f), (h), (i), and (j) of this section, a borough may levy and collect a sales tax on sales, rents, and on services provided in the borough.
The sales tax may apply to any or all of these sources.
Notwithstanding other statutes, exemptions may be granted by ordinance.
A borough may wholly or partially exempt a source from a borough sales tax that is taxed by a city in that borough under
AS

29.45.700

.”
Under sec. 9,
ch. 100, SLA 2002, this amendment of subsection (a) takes effect only “if a court of competent jurisdiction whose decisions are binding in this state enters a final judgment on the merits that is based on federal law, is no longer subject to appeal or petition for certiorari, and substantially limits or impairs the essential elements of
4 U.S.C. 116 — 126.”
Under sec. 11,
ch. 100, SLA 2002, the effective date of the conditional amendment is “the day after the last day on which the judgment described in sec. 9 . . . could have been appealed.” As of May 2022, this contingency had not occurred.

Revisor’s notes. —

Section 2, ch. 30, SLA 2005, amended the text of the conditional amendment of subsection (a).
The amendment erroneously omitted from the text the second sentence of (a), which reads “The sales tax may apply to any or all of these sources.” To correct a manifest error in sec. 2, ch. 30, SLA 2005, the text of the note as set out in the conditional amendment retains the omitted sentence.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2003 amendment, effective September 16, 2003, added subsection references in subsection (a) and added subsections (i) and (j).

The first 2005 amendment, effective August 24, 2005, in subsection (a) added “Notwithstanding other statutes” at the beginning of the next-to-last sentence and added the last sentence.

The second 2005 amendment, effective July 20, 2005, added subsection (k).

Sec. 29.45.660.
Notice of sales and use tax.

If the borough levies and collects only a sales tax and use tax, the assembly shall provide a notice substantially in the form set out in AS

29.45.020

. In providing notice under this subsection, the assembly shall substitute for the millage equivalency its estimate of the equivalent sales tax rate for each of the categories of financial assistance set out in AS

29.45.020

. Notice shall be provided

by publishing in a newspaper of general circulation in the borough a copy of the notice once each week for a period of three successive weeks, with publication to occur not later than 45 days after the final adoption of the borough’s budget; or

if there is no newspaper of general circulation in the borough, by posting a copy of the notice for at least 20 days in at least two public places in the borough, with posting to occur not later than 45 days after the final adoption of the borough’s budget.

Compliance with the provisions of this section is a prerequisite to receipt of community assistance under AS

29.60.850

—

29.60.879

. The department shall withhold annual allocations under those sections until municipal officials demonstrate that the requirements of this section have been met.

History.

(§ 12 ch 74 SLA 1985; am § 4 ch 75 SLA 1997; am § 4 ch 12 SLA 2008; am § 3 ch 44 SLA 2016)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2008 amendment, effective April 9, 2008, substituted “community revenue sharing under AS

29.60.850

—

29.60.879

” for “municipal tax resource equalization under AS

29.60.010

— 29.60.080 and priority revenue sharing for municipal services under AS

29.60.100

— 29.60.180” in the first sentence of subsection (b).

The 2016 amendment, effective January 1, 2017, in (b), substituted “assistance” for “revenue sharing”.

Sec. 29.45.670.
Referendum, adoption, and modification.

A new sales and use tax or an increase in the rate of levy of a sales tax approved by ordinance does not take effect until ratified by a majority of the voters at an election.

History.

(§ 12 ch 74 SLA 1985)

Sec. 29.45.680.
Combining sales and use tax with incorporation of a borough.

A petition for incorporation of a borough may request that a sales and use tax proposition be placed on the same ballot. The petition must state the proposed tax rate. The petition may request that incorporation be dependent on the passage of the tax proposition; if so, the incorporation proposition fails if the tax proposition fails.

History.

(§ 1 ch 3 SLA 1989)